Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5028.
people of the state of michigan enact: 1 2 3 4 CHAPTER XVII Sec. 16w. (1) This chapter applies to the following felonies enumerated in chapter 750 of the Michigan Compiled Laws: M.C.L. Category Class Description Stat Max 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 750.451(3) 750.451(2) Pub ord G Prostitution ? various offenses ? third or subsequent offenseCommercial sexual activity violation ? second offense 2 750.451(3) Pub ord F Commercial sexual activity violation ? third or subsequent offense 4 750.451(4) Pub ord E Commercial sexual activity with person less than 18 years of age 5 750.451(4) Person E Soliciting a person under 18 years of age to commit prostitution 5 750.452 Pub ord E Keeping a house of prostitutionplace for purposes of commercial sexual activity 5 750.455 Pub ord B Pandering 20 750.456 Person B Placing spouse into prostitutioncommercial sexual activity 20 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 750.457 Pub ord B Accepting earnings of a prostituteperson engaged in commercial sexual activity 20 750.458 Person B Prostitution ? Commercial sexual activity - detaining person for debt 20 750.459(1) Person B Transporting a person for prostitutionto engage in commercial sexual activity 20 750.459(2) Person E Selling travel services to facilitate prostitution commercial sexual activity or human trafficking in other jurisdictions 5 750.459(3) Person D Selling travel services to facilitate prostitution commercial sexual activity or human trafficking in other jurisdictions involving a minor 10 750.462f(1)(a) Person D Human trafficking violation 10 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 750.462f(1)(b) Person C Human trafficking violation resulting in bodily injury 15 750.462f(1)(c) Person B Human trafficking violation resulting in serious bodily injury 20 750.462f(1)(d) Person A Human trafficking violation involving death or the commission of certain felonies Life 750.462f(2) Person B Obtaining a minor for commercial sexual activity or for forced labor or services 20 750.462f(3) Person Variable Attempting, conspiring, or soliciting another to violate human trafficking laws Variable 750.465a(1)(b) Property G Operating audiovisual recording device in a theatrical facility ? second offense 2 750.465a(1)(c) Property F Operating audiovisual recording device in a theatrical facility ? third or subsequent offense 4 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 (2) For a violation of section 462f(3) of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.462f, determine the offense category, offense variable level, and prior record variable level based on the underlying offense. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect 90 days after the date it is enacted into law. Enacting section 2. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 5016 (request no. H04060'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.